Illinois, session 104th, SB4000.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Community Mental Health Workforce Paid Internship Act. 6    Section 5. Findings and purpose. 7    (a) The General Assembly finds the following:8        (1) Community mental health settings play a crucial 9    role in quality, accessible, and equitable behavioral 10    health care in Illinois.11        (2) Non-clinical staff, including human resource 12    officers, information technology technicians, finance 13    administrators, administrative services, and other 14    non-licensed clinical staff, serve important roles within 15    a mental health organization and are essential to the 16    effective operation of an organization.17        (3) Workforce shortages, lack of awareness, and 18    limited entry-level paid opportunities hinder the 19    development of a sustainable non-clinical workforce.20        (4) Paid internships improve an organization's 21    recruitment, retention, loyalty, and diversity while 22    strengthening the overall service delivery and quality of 23    care.  SB4000- 2 -LRB104 19932 KTG 33382 b1    (b) The purpose of this Act is to establish a paid 2internship program within the Department of Human Services to 3support workforce development and encourage recruitment of 4non-clinical positions in community mental health settings, 5including, but not limited to, positions in human resources, 6finance, and information technology. 7    Section 10. Definitions. As used in this Act:8    "Community mental health setting" means an organization 9funded, licensed, or certified by the Department to provide 10community mental health services.11    "Department" means the Department of Human Services. 12    "Eligible entity" means a department-approved community 13mental health setting.14    "Intern" means an individual participating in a paid 15internship program developed under this Act.16    "Non-clinical staff" means individuals who support the 17delivery of mental health services within an organization but 18do not provide licensed clinical treatment, including, but not 19limited to, administrative staff, information technology, 20finance, and human resources.  21    Section 15. Community Mental Health Workforce Paid 22Internship Program. 23    (a) The Department shall establish the Community Mental 24Health Workforce Paid Internship Program.  SB4000- 3 -LRB104 19932 KTG 33382 b1    (b) The program shall provide funding to eligible entities 2to support paid internships for non-clinical staff positions 3within a community mental health organization. 4    (c) The Department shall develop the necessary application 5procedures and standards for acceptance for eligible entities, 6including, but not limited to, consideration of the following:7        (1) workforce shortages;8        (2) service to underserved or rural communities;9        (3) commitment to training, supervision, and 10    mentorship of interns; and11        (4) efforts to promote workforce development. 12    Section 20. Internship requirements. 13    (a) Internships funded under this Act shall:14        (1) provide appropriate compensation no less than the 15    State's minimum wage;16        (2) include structured training and oversight;17        (3) be offered for no less than 10 weeks and no longer 18    than one year; and19        (4) support skill development relative to the area in 20    which the intern is assigned.21    (b) Interns may be current students, recent graduates, 22career changers, or others entering the community mental 23health field as designated by the Department. 24    Section 25. Use of funds. Funds awarded under this Act may   SB4000- 4 -LRB104 19932 KTG 33382 b1be used for:2        (1) intern wages, stipends, or other benefits;3        (2) supervision and training costs; and4        (3) other costs related to the direct provision of the 5    internship program, as approved by the Department.  6    Section 30. Reporting requirements. 7    (a) Eligible entities shall submit yearly reports to the 8Department outlining the following:9        (1) number of interns hired;10        (2) duration of internships;11        (3) positions of internships; and12        (4) employment outcomes, such as retention, following 13    internship.14    (b) The Department shall submit a report to the General 15Assembly every 2 years outlining the program's outcomes and 16impact.  17    Section 35. Rulemaking authority. The Department may 18develop and adopt rules, policies, and procedures to assist in 19the implementation and administration of this Act. 20    Section 40. Appropriations. The General Assembly may 21appropriate funds for the purposes of this Act. 22    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 232026.